North Carolina statutes. Chapter 47C. North Carolina Condominium Act.
Article 3. Management of the Condominium.

§ 47C-3-101.
Organization of unit owners’ association.

A unit owners’ association shall be organized no later than the date the first unit in the condominium is conveyed. The membership of the association at all times shall consist exclusively of all the unit owners, or following termination of the condominium,
of all persons entitled to distributions of proceeds under

G.S. 47C-2-118

. The association shall be organized as a profit or nonprofit corporation or as an unincorporated nonprofit association.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2006-226, s. 4.

§ 47C-3-102.
Powers of unit owners’ association.

Unless the declaration expressly provides to the contrary, the association, even if unincorporated, may do all of the following:

Adopt and amend bylaws and rules and regulations.

Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves and collect assessments for common expenses from unit owners.

Hire and terminate managing agents and other employees, agents, and independent contractors.

Institute, defend, or intervene in its own name in litigation or administrative proceedings on matters affecting the condominium.

Make contracts and incur liabilities.

Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of common elements.

Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common elements.

Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title, or interest to real or personal property, provided that common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest only pursuant to

G.S. 47C-3-112

.

Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or over the common elements.

Impose and receive any payments, fees, or charges for the use, rental, or operation of the common elements other than limited common elements described in subsections 47C-2-102(2) and (4) and for services provided to unit owners.

Impose charges for late payment of assessments, not to exceed the greater of twenty dollars ($20.00) per month or ten percent (10%) of any assessment installment unpaid and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, suspend privileges or services provided
by the association (except rights of access to lots) during any period that assessments or other amounts due and owing to the association remain unpaid for a period of 30 days or longer, and levy reasonable fines not to
exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00)(G.S. 47C-3-107.1) for violations of the declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the association.

Impose reasonable charges for the preparation and recordation of amendments to the declaration or resale certificates required by

G.S. 47C-4-109

. (12a) Impose reasonable charges in connection with the preparation of statements of unpaid assessments, which must be furnished within 10 business days after receipt of the request, in an amount not to
exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) per statement or request, and an additional expedite fee in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) if the request is made within 48 hours of closing, all of which charges
may be collected by the association, its managers, or its agents.

Provide for the indemnification of and maintain liability insurance for its officers, executive board, directors, employees and agents.

Assign its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense assessments.

Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this State by legal entities of the same types as the association.

Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the governance and operation of the association.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the declaration may not impose limitations on the power of the association to deal with the declarant that are more restrictive than the limitations imposed on the power of the association to deal with other persons.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2004-109, s. 2; 2005-422, ss. 10, 11; 2020-90, s. 4(a).

§ 47C-3-103.
Executive board members and officers.

Except as provided in the declaration, the bylaws, in subsection (b) or in other provisions of this chapter, the executive board may act in all instances on behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, the officers and members of the
executive board shall be deemed to stand in a fiduciary relationship to the association and the unit owners and shall discharge their duties in good faith, and with that diligence and care which ordinarily prudent persons would
exercise under similar circumstances in like positions. Officers shall act according to the standards for officers of a nonprofit corporation set forth in

G.S. 55A-8-42

, and members shall act according to the standards for directors of a nonprofit set forth in

G.S. 55A-8-30

.

The executive board may not act unilaterally on behalf of the association to amend the declaration (G.S. 47C-2-117), to terminate the condominium (G.S. 47C-2-118), or to elect members of the executive board or determine the qualifications, powers and
duties, or terms of office of executive board members (G.S. 47C-3-103(e) and (f)), but the executive board may unilaterally fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of any term. Notwithstanding any provision of
the declaration or bylaws to the contrary, the unit owners, by a majority vote of all persons present and entitled to vote at any meeting of the unit owners at which a quorum is present, may remove any member of the executive board
with or without cause, other than members appointed by the declarant.

Within 30 days after adoption of any proposed budget for the condominium, the executive board shall provide a summary of the budget to all the unit owners, and shall set a date for a meeting of the unit owners to consider ratification of the budget not
less than 10 nor more than 60 days after mailing of the summary. There shall be no requirement that a quorum be present at the meeting. The budget is ratified unless at that meeting a majority of all the unit owners or any larger
vote specified in the declaration rejects the budget. In the event the proposed budget is rejected, the periodic budget last ratified shall be continued until such time as the unit owners ratify a subsequent budget proposed by
the executive board.

Subject to subsection (e), the declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during which period a declarant, or persons designated by him, may appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board. Regardless
of the period provided in the declaration, a period of declarant control terminates no later than the earlier of: (i) 120 days after conveyance of seventy-five percent (75%) of the units (including units which may be created pursuant
to special declarant rights) to unit owners other than a declarant; (ii) two years after all declarants have ceased to offer units for sale in the ordinary course of business; or (iii) two years after any development right to add
new units was last exercised. A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the executive board before termination of that period, but in that event he may require, for the duration
of the period of declarant control, that specified actions of the association or executive board, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.

Not later than 60 days after conveyance of twenty-five percent (25%) of the units (including units which may be created pursuant to special rights) to unit owners other than a declarant, at least one member and not less than twenty-five percent (25%)
of the members of the executive board shall be elected by unit owners other than the declarant. Not later than 60 days after conveyance of fifty percent (50%) of the units (including units which may be created pursuant to special
declarant rights) to unit owners other than a declarant, not less than thirty-three percent (33%) of the members of the executive board shall be elected by unit owners other than the declarant.

Not later than the termination of any period of declarant control, the unit owners shall elect an executive board of at least three members, at least a majority of whom must be unit owners. The executive board shall elect the officers. The executive board
members and officers shall take office upon election.

The association shall publish the names and addresses of all officers and board members of the association within 30 days of the election.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2005-422, ss. 12, 13; 2020-52, s. 7.

§ 47C-3-104.
Transfer of special declarant rights.

No special declarant right (G.S. 47C-1-103(23)) created or reserved under this chapter may be transferred except by an instrument evidencing the transfer recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located. Except for the transfer
of declarant rights pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the instrument is not effective unless executed by the transferee.

Upon transfer of any special declarant right, the liability of a transferor declarant is as follows:

A transferor is not relieved of any obligation or liability arising before the transfer and remains liable for warranty obligations imposed upon the transferor by this Chapter. Lack of privity does not deprive any unit owner of standing to maintain an
action to enforce any obligation of the transferor.

If the successor to any special declarant right is an affiliate of a declarant (G.S. 47C-1-103(1)), the transferor is jointly and severally liable with the successor for any obligation or liability of the successor which relates to the condominium.

If a transferor retains any special declarant right, but transfers other special declarant rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the declarant, the transferor is liable for any obligations or liabilities imposed on a declarant by this chapter
or by the declaration relating to the retained special declarant rights and arising after the transfer.

A transferor has no liability for any act or omission or any breach of a contractual or warranty obligation arising from the exercise of a special declarant right by a successor declarant who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Unless otherwise provided in a mortgage instrument, deed of trust, or other agreement creating a security interest, in case of foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale,
or sale under Bankruptcy Code or receivership proceedings, of any units owned by a declarant, or real estate in a condominium subject to development rights, or real estate subject to development rights for a condominium, a person
acquiring title to all the property being foreclosed or sold, but only upon the person’s request in an instrument recorded with the register of deeds in every county where any portion of the condominium is located, succeeds to
all special declarant rights (G.S. 47C-1-103(23)) related to the property held by that declarant and requested by the person acquiring title. The judgment or instrument conveying title shall provide for transfer of only the special
declarant rights requested. The mortgage, deed of trust, tax lien, or other conveyance to be foreclosed under this subsection shall not be required to contain specific reference to an assignment of special declarant rights but
shall be deemed to include the special declarant rights as part of the right, title, and interest encumbered by the mortgage, deed of trust, tax lien, or other conveyance.

Upon foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under Bankruptcy Code or receivership proceedings of all units and other real estate in a condominium owned by
a declarant, the declarant ceases to have any special declarant rights and the period of declarant control (G.S. 47C-3-103(d)) terminates unless either of the following applies:

The judgment or instrument conveying title provides for transfer of all special declarant rights held by that declarant to a successor declarant.

The declarant transferred special declarant rights related to the appointment of executive board members to another person pursuant to this section prior to the foreclosure or sale.

The liabilities and obligations of persons who succeed to special declarant rights are as follows:

A successor to any special declarant right who is an affiliate of a declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed on the transferor by this Chapter or by the declaration.

Unless otherwise specified in the declaration as to the holder of a mortgage instrument, deed of trust, or other agreement creating a security interest, in case of foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security
interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under Bankruptcy Code or receivership proceedings, a successor to any special declarant right who is not an affiliate of a declarant, other than a successor described in subdivision
(3) or (4) of this subsection, is subject to the obligations and liabilities expressly imposed by this Chapter or the declaration:

On a declarant which relate to the successor’s exercise or nonexercise of special declarant rights; or

On the declarant’s transferor, other than any of the following:

Misrepresentations by the transferor or any previous declarant.

Warranty obligations on improvements made by the transferor or any previous declarant, or made before the condominium was created.

Breach of any fiduciary obligation by the transferor or any previous declarant or the declarant’s appointees to the executive board.

Any liability or obligation imposed on the transferor or any previous declarant as a result of the transferor’s acts or omissions after the transfer.

Obligations and liabilities arising out of contractual agreements between the transferor or any previous declarant and third parties other than those contained in the declaration.

A successor to only a right reserved in the declaration to maintain models, management offices, sales offices, and signs advertising the condominium (G.S. 47C-2-115), if the successor is not an affiliate of a declarant, may not exercise any other special
declarant right, and is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant, except the obligation to provide a public offering statement, and any liability arising as a result thereof.

A successor to all special declarant rights held by a transferor who is not an affiliate of that declarant and who succeeded to those rights pursuant to a deed or other instrument of conveyance in lieu of foreclosure or a judgment or instrument conveying
title to units under subsection (c) of this section, may declare in a recorded instrument the intention to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person. Thereafter, until transferring all special declarant rights
to any person acquiring title to any unit owned by the successor, or until recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, that successor may not exercise any of those rights other than the right held by
the successor’s transferor to control the executive board in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 47C-3-103(d) for the duration of any period of declarant control, and any attempted exercise of those rights is void. So
long as a successor declarant does not have the right to exercise special declarant rights under this subsection, the successor declarant is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant other than liability
for the successor declarant’s acts and omissions under G.S. 47C-3-103(d).

Nothing in this section subjects any successor to a special declarant right to any claims against, or other obligations of, a transferor declarant other than claims and obligations expressly arising under this Chapter or the declaration.

For the purposes of this section, “assignment of declarant rights” shall include any assignment by the declarant of special declarant rights to a person, including, without limitation, an assignment pursuant to this section.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2015-56, s. 2.

§ 47C-3-105.
Termination of contracts and leases of declarant.

If entered into by or on behalf of the association before the executive board elected by the unit owners pursuant to G.S. 47C-3-103(f) takes office, (1) any management contract, employment contract, or lease of recreational or parking areas or facilities,
(2) any other contract or lease between the association and a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant, or (3) any contract or lease that is not bona fide or was unconscionable to the unit owners at the time entered into under the
circumstances then prevailing may be terminated without penalty by the association at any time after the executive board elected by the unit owners pursuant to G.S. 47C-3-103(f) takes office upon not less than 90 days’ notice to the
other party. Notice of the substance of the provisions of this section shall be set out in each contract entered into by or on behalf of the association before the executive board elected by the unit owners pursuant to G.S. 47C-3-103(f)
takes office. Failure of the contract to contain such a provision shall not effect the rights of the association under this section. This section does not apply to any lease the termination of which would terminate the condominium
or reduce its size, unless the real estate subject to that lease was included in the condominium for the purpose of avoiding the right of the association to terminate a lease under this section.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-3-106.
Bylaws.

The bylaws of the association shall provide for:

The number of members of the executive board and the titles of the officers of the association;

Election by the executive board of the officers of the association;

The qualifications, powers and duties, terms of office, and manner of electing and removing executive board members and officers and filling vacancies;

Which, if any, of its powers the executive board or officers may delegate to other persons or to a managing agent;

Which of its officers may prepare, execute, certify, and record amendments to the declaration on behalf of the association; and

The method of amending the bylaws.

Any other matters the association deems necessary or appropriate.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-3-107.
Upkeep; damages; assessments for damages, fines.

Except as provided in G.S. 47C-3-113(h), the association is responsible for causing the common elements to be maintained, repaired, and replaced when necessary and to assess the unit owners as necessary to recover the costs of such maintenance, repair,
or replacement except that the cost of maintenance, repair or replacement of a limited common element shall be assessed as provided in G.S. 47C-3-115(b). Each unit owner is responsible for maintenance, repair and replacement of
his unit. Each unit owner shall afford to the association and when necessary to another unit owner access through his unit or the limited common element assigned to his unit reasonably necessary for any such maintenance, repair
or replacement activity.

If damage, for which a unit owner is legally responsible and which is not covered by insurance provided by the association pursuant to

G.S. 47C-3-113

is inflicted on any common element or limited common element, the association may direct such unit owner to repair such damage or the association may itself cause the repairs to be made and recover the costs thereof
from the responsible unit owner.

If damage is inflicted on any unit by an agent of the association in the scope of his activities as such agent, the association is liable to repair such damage or to reimburse the unit owner for the cost of repairing such damages. The association shall
also be liable for any losses to the unit owner.

The bylaws of the association may in cases when the claim under subsection (b) or (c) is five hundred dollars ($500.00) or less provide for hearings before an adjudicatory panel to determine if a unit owner is responsible for damages to any common element
or whether the association is responsible for damages to any unit. Such panel shall accord to the party charged with causing damages notice of the charge, opportunity to be heard and to present evidence, and notice of the decision.
This panel may assess a liability for each damage incident not in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00) against each unit owner charged or against the association. Liabilities of unit owners so assessed shall be assessments
secured by lien under

G.S. 47C-3-116

. Liabilities of the association may be offset by the unit owner against sums owing the association and if so offset shall reduce the amount of any lien of the association against the unit at issue.

The declarant alone is liable for maintenance, repair and all other expenses in connection with real estate subject to development rights.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2013-34, s. 1.

§ 47C-3-107.1.
Procedures for fines and suspension of condominium privileges or services.

Unless a specific procedure for the imposition of fines or suspension of condominium privileges or services is provided for in the declaration, a hearing shall be held before the executive board or an adjudicatory panel appointed by the executive board
to determine if any unit owner should be fined or if condominium privileges or services should be suspended pursuant to the powers granted to the association in G.S. 47C-3-102(11). Any adjudicatory panel appointed by the executive
board shall be composed of members of the association who are not officers of the association or members of the executive board. The unit owner charged shall be given notice of the charge, opportunity to be heard and to present evidence,
and notice of the decision. If it is decided that a fine should be imposed, a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) may be imposed for the violation and without further hearing, for each day more than five days after the
decision that the violation occurs. Such fines shall be assessments secured by liens under

G.S. 47C-3-116

. If it is decided that a suspension of condominium privileges or services should be imposed, the suspension may be continued without further hearing until the violation or delinquency is cured. A unit owner may appeal
a decision of an adjudicatory panel to the full executive board by delivering written notice of appeal to the executive board within 15 days after the date of the decision. The executive board may affirm, vacate, or modify the prior
decision of the adjudicatory body.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 27; 2005-422, s. 14.

§ 47C-3-108.
Meetings.

A meeting of the association shall be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the association may be called by the president, a majority of the executive board, or by unit owners having twenty percent (20%) or any lower percentage specified
in the bylaws of the votes in the association. Not less than 10 nor more than 60 days in advance of any meeting, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by
United States mail to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the unit owner, or sent by electronic means, including by electronic mail over the Internet, to an electronic mailing
address designated in writing by the unit owner. The notice of any meeting must state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws,
any budget changes, and any proposal to remove a director or officer.

Meetings of the executive board shall be held as provided in the bylaws. At regular intervals, the executive board meeting shall provide unit owners an opportunity to attend a portion of an executive board meeting and to speak to the executive board about
their issues and concerns. The executive board may place reasonable restrictions on the number of persons who speak on each side of an issue and may place reasonable time restrictions on persons who speak.

Except as otherwise provided for in the bylaws, meetings of the association and executive board shall be conducted in accordance with the most recent edition of Robert’s Rules of Order Newly Revised.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2004-109, s. 5; 2005-422, s. 15; 2020-52, s. 8.

§ 47C-3-109.
Quorums.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the association if persons entitled to cast twenty percent (20%) of the votes which may be cast for election of the executive board are present in person or by proxy
at the beginning of the meeting.

Unless the bylaws specify a larger percentage, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the executive board of persons entitled to cast fifty percent (50%) of the votes on that board are present at the beginning of the meeting.

In the event business cannot be conducted at any meeting because a quorum is not present, that meeting may be adjourned to a later date by the affirmative vote of a majority of those present in person or by proxy. Notwithstanding any provision to the
contrary in the declaration or the bylaws, the quorum requirement at the next meeting shall be one-half of the quorum requirement applicable to the meeting adjourned for lack of a quorum. This provision shall continue to reduce
the quorum by fifty percent (50%) from that required at the previous meeting, as previously reduced, until such time as a quorum is present and business can be conducted.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2020-52, s. 9.

§ 47C-3-110.
Voting; proxies.

If only one of the multiple owners of a unit is present at a meeting of the association, he is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that unit. If more than one of the multiple owners are present, the votes allocated to that unit may be cast only
in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the multiple owners, unless the declaration or bylaws expressly provides otherwise. Majority agreement is conclusively presumed if any one of the multiple owners casts
the votes allocated to that unit without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other owners of the unit.

Votes allocated to a unit may be cast pursuant to a proxy duly executed by a unit owner. If a unit is owned by more than one person, each owner of the unit may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other owners of the unit through a
duly executed proxy. A unit owner may not revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section except by written notice of revocation delivered to the person presiding over a meeting of the association. A proxy is void if it is not dated.
A proxy terminates one year after its date, unless it specifies a shorter term.

If the declaration requires that votes on specified matters affecting the condominium be cast by lessees rather than unit owners of leased units: (i) the provisions of subsection (a) and (b) apply to lessees as if they were unit owners; (ii) unit owners
who have leased their units to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and (iii) lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were unit
owners. Unit owners must also be given notice, in the manner provided in

G.S. 47C-3-108

, of all meetings at which lessees may be entitled to vote.

No votes allocated to a unit owned by the association may be cast.

The declaration may provide that on specified issues only a defined subgroup of unit owners may vote provided:

The issue being voted on is of special interest solely to members of the subgroup; and

All except de minimis costs that will be incurred based on the vote taken will be assessed solely against those unit owners entitled to vote.

For purposes of subdivision (e)(1) above an issue to be voted on is not of special interest solely to a subgroup if it substantially affects the overall appearance of the condominium or substantially affects living conditions of unit owners not included
in the voting subgroup.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-3-111.
Tort and contract liability.

Neither the association nor any unit owner except the declarant is liable for that declarant’s torts in connection with any part of the condominium which that declarant has the responsibility to maintain.

An action alleging a wrong done by the association must be brought against the association and not against a unit owner.

If an action is brought against the association for a wrong which occurred during any period of declarant control, and if the association gives the declarant who then controlled the association reasonable notice of and an opportunity to defend against
the action, such declarant is liable to the association:

for all tort losses not covered by insurance carried by the association suffered by the association or that unit owner, and

for all losses which the association would not have incurred but for a breach of contract. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to impose strict or absolute liability upon the declarant for wrongs or actions which occurred during the period of
declarant control.

In any case where the declarant is liable to the association under this section, the declarant is also liable for all litigation expenses, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, incurred by the association. Any statute of limitation affecting the association’s
right of action under this section is tolled until the period of declarant control terminates. A unit owner is not precluded from bringing an action contemplated by this section because he is a unit owner or a member or officer
of the association. Liens resulting from judgments against the association are governed by

G.S. 47C-3-117

(Other Liens Affecting the Condominium).

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-3-112.
Conveyance or encumbrance of common elements.

Portions of the common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest by the association if persons entitled to cast at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the association, including eighty percent (80%) of the votes allocated to
units not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, agree to that action; provided, that all the owners of units to which any limited common element is allocated must agree in order to convey that
limited common element or subject it to a security interest. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. Distribution of the proceeds of the sale
of a limited common element shall be as provided by agreement between the unit owners to which it is allocated and the association. Proceeds of the sale or financing of a common element (other than a limited common element) shall
be an asset of the association.

An agreement to convey common elements or subject them to a security interest must be evidenced by the execution of an agreement, or ratifications thereof, in the same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of unit owners. The agreement must specify
a date after which the agreement will be void unless recorded before that date. The agreement and all ratifications thereof must be recorded in every county in which a portion of the condominium is situated, and is effective only
upon recordation.

The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract to convey common elements, or subject them to a security interest, but the contract is not enforceable against the association until approved pursuant to subsections (a) and (b). Thereafter,
the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the conveyance or encumbrance, including the power to execute deeds or other instruments.

Any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale or other voluntary transfer of common elements, unless made pursuant to this section, is void.

A conveyance or encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section shall not deprive any unit of its rights of access and support.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-3-113.
Insurance.

Commencing not later than the time of the first conveyance of a unit to a person other than a declarant, the association shall maintain, to the extent available:

Property insurance on the common elements insuring against all risks of direct physical loss commonly insured against including fire and extended coverage perils. The total amount of insurance after application of any deductibles shall be not less than
eighty percent (80%) of the replacement cost of the insured property at the time the insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, foundations and other items normally excluded from property
policies; and

Liability insurance in reasonable amounts, covering all occurrences commonly insured against death, bodily injury and property damage arising out of or in connection with the use, ownership, or maintenance of the common elements.

In the case of a building containing units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, the insurance maintained under subdivision (a)(1), to the extent reasonably available, shall include the units, but need not include improvements and
betterments installed by unit owners.

If the insurance described in subsection (a) or (b) of this section is not reasonably available, the association promptly shall cause notice of that fact to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to all unit owners. The declaration may
require the association to carry any other insurance, and the association in any event may carry any other insurance it deems appropriate to protect the association or the unit owners.

Insurance policies carried pursuant to subsection (a) must provide that:

Each unit owner is an insured person under the policy with respect to liability arising out of his interest in the common elements or membership in the association;

The insurer waives its right to subrogation under the policy against any unit owner or members of his household;

No act or omission by any unit owner, unless acting within the scope of his authority on behalf of the association, will preclude recovery under the policy; and

If, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a unit owner covering the same risk covered by the policy, the association’s policy provides primary insurance.

Any loss covered by the property policy under subsections (a)(1) and (b) shall be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for that loss shall be payable to any insurance trustee designated for that purpose, or otherwise to the association,
and not to any mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold any insurance proceeds in trust for unit owners and lienholders as their interests may appear. Subject to the provisions
of subsection (h), the proceeds shall be disbursed first for the repair or restoration of the damaged property, and unit owners and lienholders are not entitled to receive payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is
a surplus of proceeds after the property has been completely repaired or restored, or the condominium is terminated.

An insurance policy issued to the association does not prevent a unit owner from obtaining insurance for his own benefit.

An insurer that has issued an insurance policy under this section shall issue certificates or memoranda of insurance to the association and, upon written request, to any unit owner, mortgagee, or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurer issuing
the policy may not cancel or refuse to renew it until 30 days after notice of the proposed cancellation or nonrenewal has been mailed to the association, each unit owner and each mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust to
whom certificates or memoranda of insurance have been issued at their respective last known addresses.

Any portion of the condominium for which insurance is required under this section which is damaged or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless (1) the condominium is terminated, (2) repair or replacement would be illegal
under any State or local health or safety statute or ordinance, or (3) the unit owners decide not to rebuild by an eighty percent (80%) vote, including one hundred percent (100%) approval of owners of units not to be rebuilt or
owners assigned to limited common elements not to be rebuilt. The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds and reserves is a common expense. If the entire condominium is not repaired or replaced, (1) the insurance
proceeds attributable to the damaged common elements shall be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the condominium, (2) the insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited common
elements which are not rebuilt shall be distributed to the owners of those units and the owners of the units to which those limited common elements were allocated or to lienholders, as their interest may appear, and (3) the remainder
of the proceeds shall be distributed to all the unit owners or lienholders, as their interest may appear, in proportion to their common element interest. If the unit owners vote not to rebuild any unit, that unit’s allocated interests
are automatically reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been condemned under

G.S. 47C-1-107(a)

, and the association promptly shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection,

G.S. 47C-2-118

governs the distribution of insurance proceeds if the condominium is terminated.

The provisions of this section may be varied or waived in the case of a condominium all of whose units are restricted to nonresidential use.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 1998-211, s. 8(a)-(c).

§ 47C-3-114.
Surplus funds.

Unless otherwise provided in the declaration, any surplus funds of the association remaining after payment of or provisions for common expenses and any prepayment of reserves must be paid to the unit owners in proportion to their common expense liabilities
or credited to them to reduce their future common expense assessments.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.